Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0303

Method of voting on amendment of organic rules.

(1) A substantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may not be made at the members meeting at which a vote on the amendment occurs.

(2) A nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment of the organic rules may be made at the members meeting at which the vote on the amendment occurs and need not be separately voted upon by the board of directors.

(3) A vote to adopt a nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment to the organic rules must be by the same percentage of votes required to pass a proposed amendment.

[ 2019 c 37 s 303.]